Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.020

Service of process.

All process provided for in this chapter may be served in the same manner as is provided by law for the service of process in the superior court; and it shall be the duty of any officer to whom any process may be delivered or issued, to serve the same as directed: PROVIDED, That in the service of process a copy thereof shall be delivered to the witness.

[ 1895 c 6 s 15; RRS s 8192.]

NOTES:

Service of summons: RCW 4.28.080.